Rhode Island statutes. Constitution of the State of Rhode Island
Article X Of the Judicial Power

§ 1. Power vested in court.

The judicial power of this state shall be vested in one supreme court, and in such inferior courts as the general assembly may, from time to time, ordain and establish.

§ 2. Jurisdiction of supreme and inferior courts — Quorum of supreme court.

The supreme court shall have final revisory and appellate jurisdiction upon all questions of law and equity. It shall have power to issue prerogative writs, and shall also have such other jurisdiction as may, from time to time, be prescribed by law. A majority of its judges shall always be necessary to constitute a quorum. The inferior courts shall have such jurisdiction as may, from time to time, be prescribed by law.

§ 3. Advisory opinions by supreme court.

The judges of the supreme court shall give their written opinion upon any question of law whenever requested by the governor or by either house of the general assembly.

§ 4. State court judges — Judicial selection.

The governor shall fill any vacancy of any justice of the Rhode Island Supreme Court by nominating, on the basis of merit, a person from a list submitted by an independent non-partisan judicial nominating commission, and by and with the advice and consent of the senate, and by and with the separate advice and consent of the house of representatives, shall appoint said person as a justice of the Rhode Island Supreme Court. The governor shall fill any vacancy of any judge of the Rhode Island Superior Court, Family Court, District, Workers’ Compensation Court, Administrative Adjudication Court, or any other state court which the general assembly may from time to time establish by nominating on the basis of merit, a person from a list submitted by the aforesaid judicial nominating commission, and by and with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint said person to the court where the vacancy occurs. The powers, duties, and composition of the judicial nominating commission shall be defined by statute.

§ 5. Tenure of supreme court justices.

Justices of the supreme court shall hold office during good behavior.

History of Section.

The majority of the electorate approved the separation of powers amendment in a statewide referendum on November 2, 2004; and this result was certified by the Board of Elections on November 23, 2004.

§ 6. Judges of supreme court — Compensation.

The judges of the supreme court shall receive a compensation for their services, which shall not be diminished during their continuance in office.

§ 7. Wardens and justices of the peace.

The towns of New Shoreham and Jamestown may continue to elect their wardens as heretofore. The other towns and the city of Providence may elect such number of justices of the peace, resident therein, as they may deem proper. The jurisdiction of said justices and wardens shall be regulated by law. The justices shall be commissioned by the governor.